Hawaii statutes.
§149A-13 Procedure for licensing
pesticides. (a) Any pesticide which is received, used, sold, offered for
sale, or distributed within this State shall be licensed by the board. Any
pesticide product which has been sold in this State but for which the license
is not renewed can be used by the purchaser. However, the product cannot be
sold, resold, or distributed within the State before its license is renewed.
The licensee shall file with the department a statement including:

(1) The name and address of the licensee and the name
and address of the person whose name will appear on the label, if other than
the licensee;

(2) The name of the pesticide;

(3) A complete copy of the labeling accompanying the
pesticide and a statement of all claims to be made for it, including directions
for use; and

(4) If requested by the department, a full
description of the tests made and the results thereof upon which the claims are
based.

(b) The licensee shall pay $75 for each year,
or fraction thereof, that the pesticide is licensed. Licensing fees may be
increased or decreased from time to time by rules and may vary according to the
amount or quantity of pesticide to be sold, offered for sale, or distributed.
The term of the license shall be for a period of up to three years. A license
shall expire on December 31 of the third year. In case of renewal of
license, a statement shall be required only with respect to information which
is different from that furnished when the pesticide was licensed or last relicensed.

(c) When a licensee discontinues the
distribution of a pesticide which has been licensed in this State, the licensee
will be required to continue licensing of this pesticide until no more remains
on the retailer's shelves, or for three years after written notice to the
department of the date of discontinuance; provided that the continued sale is
not specifically prohibited by the department or the EPA.

(d) The department, whenever it deems
necessary in the administration of this chapter, may require the submission of
the complete formula of any pesticide. If it appears to the department that
the composition of the pesticide is complete as to warrant the proposed claims
for it and if the pesticide and its labeling and other material required to be
submitted comply with the requirements of section 149A-15, the department shall
license the pesticide.

(e) Notwithstanding any other provision of
this chapter, licensing of a pesticide is not required in the case of a
pesticide shipped from one plant within this State to another plant within this
State when both plants are operated by the same person. [L 1972, c 58, pt of
§1; am L 1975, c 126, pt of §1; am L 1981, c 33, §3; am L 1985, c 243, §1; am L
1987, c 310, §5; am L 1996, c 281, §2]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next